Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.52.080

Criminal trespass in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the second degree if he or she knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in or upon premises of another under circumstances not constituting criminal trespass in the first degree.

(2) Criminal trespass in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 373; 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 13; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.52.080.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 244: See RCW 9A.44.902.